Utah statutes.
61-2e-302.   Adherence to standards.
(1)  An appraisal management company required to be registered under this
chapter shall have a system in place to review the work of an appraiser who
performs a real estate appraisal activity for the appraisal management company
on a periodic basis to ensure that a real estate appraisal activity is
conducted in accordance with applicable appraisal standards.
(2)  As part of the registration process under Part 2, Registration, an
appraisal management company shall biennially provide an explanation of the
system described in Subsection (1) in the form prescribed by the division.
